Washington statutes.
RCW 15.130.130

Administrative procedure act.

Chapter 34.05 RCW governs the administration of this chapter including but not limited to rule making, assessment of civil penalties, orders, emergency actions, and license suspension, revocation, or denial.

[ 2018 c 236 s 104.]